Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB334.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 150.022 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources Commission shall consist of nine
(9) members, one (1) from each commission district, as set out by the commissioner
with the approval of the commission, and not more than five (5) of the same
political party.
(2) The Governor shall appoint the members of the commission subject to confirmation
by the Senate as described in subsection (3) of this section. Each of the members
shall be appointed for a term ending on December 31 of the fourth calendar year
following his or her appointment. A member whose reappointment is not confirmed
by the Senate while it is in session shall vacate his or her seat upon the date of sine
die adjournment of the session in which the confirmation was declined. Otherwise,
a member's term shall continue until his or her successor is duly appointed and
confirmed by the Senate, but no later than one (1) year following the expiration of
the member's term. If after one (1) year a successor has not been duly appointed and
confirmed by the Senate, the commission member's[commissioner's] seat for that
district shall be vacant until a successor is duly appointed and confirmed by the
Senate. A member shall serve no more than two (2) full terms, not including any
partial term that a member may additionally serve. A person who has been
convicted of a felony offense or a violation of any hunting or fishing law or
regulation, in Kentucky or under the law of any other state, or any other law of the
United States shall not be eligible to serve on the commission.
(3) (a) Vacancies through the expiration of terms of the members of the commission
shall be filled by appointment by the Governor from a list of five (5) names
from each commission district, recommended and submitted by the sportsmen
Page 1 of 7
XXXX 3/2/2026 8:16 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2326
or sportswomen of each respective district.
(b) When the term of a member expires, the commissioner shall call a meeting of
the sportsmen and sportswomen in that district not later than thirty (30) days
prior to the expiration of the member's term. Notice of the meeting shall be
given by publication pursuant to KRS Chapter 424.
(c) At the meeting, the sportsmen or sportswomen in attendance shall select and
submit to the Governor a list of five (5) residents and citizens of the district,
each of whom:[ who]
1. Is either an experienced hunter, angler, trapper, farmer, or biologist;
2. Has[have] held a hunting and fishing license[licenses] in Kentucky or
another state for at least the previous five (5) consecutive years;[, or
who have been hunting and fishing in the Commonwealth for the
previous five (5) consecutive years while license-exempt under KRS
150.170, and who]
3. Is[Are] well informed on the subject of wildlife conservation and
restoration, including the North American Model of Wildlife
Conservation; and
4. Has an active membership in a conservation or sportsman's or
sportswoman's organization in the Commonwealth.
(d) Each sportsman or sportswomen may vote for one (1) candidate only, and the
list submitted to the Governor shall be made up of the names of the five (5)
candidates receiving the five (5) highest vote totals.
(e)[(d)] The Governor shall appoint a successor to the member whose term has
expired no later than January 20 of the year following the year in which the
member's term expired.
(f) Upon appointment by the Governor, each appointee to the commission shall
file with the Secretary of State an affidavit, duly signed and sworn, setting
Page 2 of 7
XXXX 3/2/2026 8:16 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2326
forth in detail how he or she complies with qualifications and requirements
of this section.
(g) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Senate shall not
consider any legislation confirming the appointment or reappointment of a
member of the commission unless:
(a) The legislation has been referred to the Senate standing committee of
jurisdiction as determined by the Senate Committee on Committees;
(b) A meeting of the Senate standing committee to which the legislation
was referred has been held to determine the qualifications of the
nominee and to review the affidavit required under paragraph (f) of
this subsection; and
(c) The legislation has been reported favorably by the Senate standing
committee.
(4) Upon appointment to the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources Commission,
each member of the commission[commissioner] shall execute a bond of one
thousand dollars ($1,000) in favor of the Department of Fish and Wildlife
Resources, the premium on this bond to be paid out of department funds.
(5) In the event of vacancies other than by expiration, the Governor shall fill the
vacancy for the unexpired part of the term from the names remaining on the list
previously submitted for the district from which the vacancy arose. An appointee
chosen under this subsection shall not serve on the commission until duly
confirmed by the Senate.
(6) Each member of the commission shall take the constitutional oath of office.
(7) The Governor shall remove any member of the commission for cause under
subsection (2) of this section and may remove a member of the commission for
nonfeasance, neglect of duty, or misconduct in office; but shall first deliver to the
member a copy of all charges in writing and afford to him or her an opportunity for
Page 3 of 7
XXXX 3/2/2026 8:16 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2326
an administrative hearing to be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
(8) Each member of the commission shall be entitled to reimbursement for actual and
necessary traveling and other expenses incurred by him or her in the discharge of
his or her official duties and to be paid from the game and fish fund.
(9) A majority of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any
business, for the performance of any duty or for the exercise of any power vested in
the commission.
(10) The department shall have its principal office in Franklin County, and is authorized
to purchase all supplies, equipment, and printed forms and to issue any notices and
publications as the commissioner may deem necessary to carry out the provisions of
this chapter.
(11) Within one (1) year of his or her initial appointment to the commission, a
commission member shall complete six (6) hours of executive branch ethics
training conducted by the Executive Branch Ethics Commission established
under KRS Chapter 11A. Each commission member shall complete three (3)
hours of executive branch ethics training each year that he or she serves on the
commission thereafter. Current commission members shall complete their initial
six (6) hours of executive branch ethics training within one (1) year after the
effective date of this Act.
(12) The word "sportsman" or "sportswoman" as used in this section shall mean a
resident hunter or fisherman or fisherwoman who has been licensed in Kentucky
for each of the past two (2) consecutive years.
Section 2. KRS 150.061 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Notwithstanding any provisions of KRS Chapter 18A, 42, 45, 45A, 56, or 64
to the contrary, the commission shall have the sole authority to appoint a
commissioner of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources, who shall be
a person:
Page 4 of 7
XXXX 3/2/2026 8:16 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2326
1. With knowledge of and experience in the requirements for the
protection, conservation and restoration of the wildlife resources of the
Commonwealth;[state]
2. Who has demonstrated active participation in hunting, fishing, or both
for ten (10) years prior to appointment;
3. Who has held a hunting and fishing license in Kentucky or another
state for at least the previous three (3) consecutive years; and
4. Who has not served on the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources
Commission for at least three (3) years.
(b) The commission shall be the sole contracting body for the purposes of KRS
Chapter 45A and shall submit any proposed personal service contract with a
commissioner to the Government Contact Review Committee for its review
pursuant to KRS 45A.690 to 45A.725. The commissioner shall serve for a
defined employment contract term not to exceed four (4) years and shall be
subject to:
1.[(a)] Annual review by the commission in closed, executive session;
2.[(b)] Removal by the commission for the same cause and in the same
manner in which the Governor may remove a member of the
commission;[ and]
3.[(c)] Reappointment by the commission; and
4. Confirmation by the Senate.
(2) For commissioner vacancies that occur after the effective date of this Act, the
commission shall conduct a national search to identify the best qualified
individual to hold the position and carry out the requirements of this chapter.
(3) The commissioner shall receive such compensation as the commission may solely
determine, and shall be reimbursed for all actual and necessary travel and other
expenses incurred by him or her in the performance of his or her official duties.
Page 5 of 7
XXXX 3/2/2026 8:16 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2326
(4)[(3)] Before entering upon the duties of his or her office, the commissioner shall
take and subscribe to the constitutional oath of office, and shall, in addition thereto,
swear or affirm that he or she holds no other public office, nor any position upon or
under any political committee or party. Upon appointment by the commission, the
commissioner shall execute a bond of five thousand dollars ($5,000) in favor of the
Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources, the premium on said bond to be paid
out of department funds.
(5)[(4)] Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the commissioner shall
be the sole appointing authority for the department for the purposes of KRS Chapter
18A and shall have general supervision and control of all activities, functions,
appointments, and employees of the department. He or she shall enforce all
provisions of the laws of the state relating to wild animals, birds, fish and
amphibians, and shall exercise all powers necessarily incident thereto not
specifically conferred on the commission. The commissioner shall make an annual
report of all receipts and disbursements and file same with the Secretary of State of
the Commonwealth of Kentucky.
(6)[(5)] If federal or other grant funds become available to pay their salaries, the
commissioner may appoint and employ other persons that he or she may deem
necessary or desirable to accomplish the purposes of this chapter. The
commissioner shall determine the compensation, duties, and terms of employment
of these employees, and grant funded, time-limited positions shall be approved by
the commission as needed. Employees whose salaries are funded through federal or
other grant funds shall not be counted in any tally of permanent employees made
for employee cap or budgetary purposes.
Section 3. Whereas it is critical that that the changes to the qualifications for the
members of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources Commission and the
commissioner be enacted as soon as possible to apply to any new vacancies that may
Page 6 of 7
XXXX 3/2/2026 8:16 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2326
arise, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and
approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Page 7 of 7
XXXX 3/2/2026 8:16 AM Jacketed